Maine, session 132, LD1908.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
RIGHT TO REPAIR ELECTRONIC EQUIPMENT
§1500-Y. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Authorized repair provider. "Authorized repair provider" means:
A. An original equipment manufacturer that offers the services of diagnosis,
maintenance or repair of the digital electronic equipment it manufactures; or
B. A person that is unaffiliated with an original equipment manufacturer and that has
an arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer under which the original
equipment manufacturer grants to the person a license to use a trade name, service mark
or related characteristics for the purposes of offering the services of diagnosis,
maintenance or repair of digital electronic equipment under the name of or on behalf
of the original equipment manufacturer. For the purposes of this paragraph, "service
mark" has the same meaning as in section 1521, subsection 6.
2. Authorized 3rd-party provider. "Authorized 3rd-party provider" means a person
that is unaffiliated with an original equipment manufacturer and that has an arrangement
with the original equipment manufacturer under which the original equipment
manufacturer grants to the person a license to use a trade name to distribute parts, tools or
documentation under the name of or on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer.
3. Diagnosis. "Diagnosis" means the process of identifying the issue or issues causing
digital electronic equipment to not be in full working order.
4. Digital electronic equipment; equipment. "Digital electronic equipment" or
"equipment" means a hardware product that has a wholesale price to a retailer, or to others
outside of direct retail sale, of not less than $50 and that depends in whole or in part on
digital electronics embedded in or attached to the product for the product to function.
"Digital electronic equipment" does not include:
A. A motor vehicle that is designed to transport individuals or property on a street or
highway and is certified by a motor vehicle manufacturer under all requirements for
the distribution and sale of motor vehicles in the United States;
B. A medical device or a digital electronic product intended primarily for use in a
medical setting including diagnostic, monitoring or control equipment or any product
or service offered through such a device or product;
C. Off-road or nonroad equipment, including, but not limited to, farm and utility
tractors; farm implements; farm machinery; forestry equipment; industrial equipment;
utility equipment; construction equipment; compact construction equipment; mining
equipment; turf, yard and garden equipment; outdoor power equipment, including
Page 1 - 132LR1519(01)

410 portable generators; aviation, marine, all-terrain sports and recreational vehicles,
421 including racing vehicles; stand-alone or integrated stationary or mobile internal
432 combustion engines; other power sources, including, but not limited to, generator sets,
443 electric or battery and fuel cell power; power tools; and any tools, technology,
454 attachments, accessories, components or repair parts for any such equipment;
D. Commercial and industrial electrical switchgear equipment, including power
distribution equipment; commercial visual display equipment; medium-voltage or low-
voltage switchgear and transformers; power control equipment such as medium-
voltage or low-voltage motor control and drives; remote power panels; power
distribution units and static or transfer switches; and any tools, technology,
attachments, accessories, components or repair parts for any such equipment;
E. Safety communications equipment intended to be used for emergency response or
prevention purposes by a law enforcement, fire or medical and emergency rescue
services agency or other emergency service organization;
F. Security or life safety systems or alarm systems, including any related software or
components, that have a digital electronic product embedded within them; or
G. A video game console, including, but not limited to, a video game console machine,
a handheld video game console device or other similar device or system, including any
associated components or peripherals.
5. Documentation. "Documentation" means, with respect to digital electronic
equipment, a manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description, circuit schematic
or similar kind of information required for effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance
or repair of equipment manufactured or sold by an original equipment manufacturer to
facilitate the diagnosis, maintenance or repair of the equipment.
6. Independent repair provider. "Independent repair provider" means an individual
or business operating in the State that is not an authorized repair provider and that is not
affiliated with an authorized repair provider and that is engaged in diagnosing, maintaining
and repairing digital electronic equipment.
7. Maintenance. "Maintenance" means, with respect to digital electronic equipment,
any action necessary to keep currently working digital electronic equipment in full working
order.
8. Medical device. "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant or other similar or related article, including a component,
part or accessory, as described in 21 United States Code, Section 321(h) that is intended
for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment
or prevention of disease in humans or animals.
9. Modification. "Modification" or "modify" means, with respect to digital electronic
equipment, any alteration to the equipment that is not maintenance and not repair.
10. Motor vehicle. "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 1171,
subsection 11 and includes any component or part of the motor vehicle.
11. Motor vehicle dealer. "Motor vehicle dealer" means an individual or business
engaged in the selling or leasing of motor vehicles pursuant to a franchise agreement that
has obtained a license under applicable vehicle and traffic laws and that, pursuant to the
Page 2 - 132LR1519(01)

414 franchise agreement, is engaged in diagnosing, maintaining and repairing motor vehicles
425 and motor vehicle engines.
12. Motor vehicle manufacturer. "Motor vehicle manufacturer" means a business
engaged in the manufacturing or assembling of motor vehicles.
13. On fair and reasonable terms. "On fair and reasonable terms" means, with
respect to documentation, parts and tools required for the diagnosis, maintenance and repair
of digital electronic equipment, that such documentation, parts and tools are made available
by the original equipment manufacturer at costs and on terms that are at least as favorable
as the most favorable costs and terms under which the manufacturer offers the
documentation, parts and tools to an authorized repair provider, accounting for any
discount, rebate or financial incentive offered to the authorized repair provider by the
manufacturer, and that:
A. With respect to documentation required for repair, such documentation is made
available by the original equipment manufacturer:
(1) On terms that do not require the recipient of the documentation to be or to
become an authorized repair provider; and
(2) At no charge, except that, when the documentation is requested in physical
printed form, the manufacturer may require payment for the reasonable actual costs
of preparing and sending the printed documentation;
B. With respect to tools required for repair, such tools are made available by the
original equipment manufacturer:
(1) On terms that do not require the recipient of the tool to be or to become an
authorized repair provider;
(2) Without any impediments to use; and
(3) At no charge for use or operation of the tool, except that when the tool is
requested in physical form, the manufacturer may require payment for the
reasonable, actual costs of procuring, preparing and sending the tool; and
C. With respect to parts required for repair, such parts are made available by the
original equipment manufacturer either directly or through an authorized 3rd-party
provider, distributor or authorized repair provider on terms that do not require the
recipient of the part to be or to become an authorized repair provider.
14. Original equipment manufacturer; manufacturer. "Original equipment
manufacturer" or "manufacturer" means a business engaged in the selling or leasing of or
in otherwise supplying new digital electronic equipment manufactured by or on behalf of
the business.
15. Owner. "Owner" means an individual or business that owns digital electronic
equipment purchased or used in the State.
16. Part. "Part" means, with respect to digital electronic equipment, any replacement
part or assembly of parts, either new or used, or their equivalents, for maintaining or
repairing digital electronic equipment manufactured or sold by the manufacturer.
17. Parts pairing. "Parts pairing" means a manufacturer's practice of using software
to identify component parts through a unique identifier.
Page 3 - 132LR1519(01)

18. Repair. "Repair" means, with respect to digital electronic equipment, any action
necessary to restore the equipment to full working order. "Repair" does not include post-
sale modifications that alter the originally intended functioning of the digital electronic
equipment.
19. Tool. "Tool" means, with respect to digital electronic equipment, a software
program, hardware implement or other apparatus, including any updates, or its equivalent,
used for diagnosing, maintaining or repairing digital electronic equipment manufactured or
sold by the manufacturer, including software or other mechanisms that provide a new part,
program a new part, pair a new part, calibrate functionality or perform any other function
required to repair the original part.
20. Trade name. "Trade name" has the same meaning as in section 1521, subsection
7.
21. Trade secret. "Trade secret" means anything tangible or intangible or
electronically stored or kept that constitutes, represents, evidences or records intellectual
property, including secret or confidentially held designs, processes, procedures, formulas,
inventions or improvements or secret or confidentially held scientific, technical,
merchandising, production, financial, business or management information, or other
intellectual property that falls within the meaning of a trade secret under 18 United States
Code, Section 1839.
§1500-Z. Right to repair
The following provisions govern the diagnosis, maintenance and repair of digital
electronic equipment sold or in use in this State.
1. Original equipment manufacturers; requirement. Beginning January 1, 2026,
and except as otherwise provided in this section, an original equipment manufacturer of
digital electronic equipment sold or in use in the State on or after July 1, 2021 shall make
available on fair and reasonable terms to any independent repair provider or owner of the
equipment any documentation, parts or tools, or their equivalents, required for the
diagnosis, maintenance or repair of the equipment.
An original equipment manufacturer that does not have access to documentation, parts or
tools and does not offer services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of particular digital
electronic equipment is not required to produce documentation, parts or tools for that
particular equipment.
2. Prohibited uses of parts pairing. For consumer electronic equipment that is
manufactured for the first time, and first sold or used in this State, after January 1, 2026,
an original equipment manufacturer may not use parts pairing to:
A. Prevent or inhibit an independent repair provider or an owner from installing or
enabling the function of an otherwise functional replacement part or a component of
consumer electronic equipment, including a replacement part or a component that the
original equipment manufacturer has not approved;
B. Intentionally reduce the functionality or performance of consumer electronic
equipment; or
C. Cause consumer electronic equipment to display misleading alerts or warnings,
which the owner cannot immediately dismiss, about unidentified parts.
Page 4 - 132LR1519(01)

3. Additional limitations and exclusions. Notwithstanding any provision of this
section to the contrary:
A. An original equipment manufacturer is not required to:
(1) Provide or make available to an independent repair provider or owner
documentation, parts or tools if:
(a) The part or tool is no longer available to the original equipment
manufacturer; or
(b) The tool is used by the original equipment manufacturer only to perform
no-cost diagnostic services virtually through telephone, Internet, chat function,
e-mail or similar means that do not involve the manufacturer's physically
handling the owner's equipment, unless the manufacturer also makes that
documentation or tool available to persons unaffiliated with the manufacturer;
(2) Divulge any trade secret except as necessary to perform diagnosis,
maintenance or repair on fair and reasonable terms;
(3) Make available to an independent repair provider or owner documentation,
parts or tools that would disable, reset or override electronic privacy or security
locks or security-related measures or functions, or disable or override antitheft
security or privacy measures set by the owner of the equipment without the owner's
authorization. This subparagraph may not be construed to relieve the original
equipment manufacturer's obligation to make available to an independent repair
provider or owner such documentation, parts or tools if the owner provides
authorization;
(4) Provide documentation, parts or tools for any digital electronic equipment if
reconditioning or repair of the equipment is prohibited by law;
(5) Provide documentation or tools used exclusively by the original equipment
manufacturer for diagnosis, maintenance or repairs completed by machines that
operate on several digital electronic equipment products simultaneously or
otherwise for purposes of large-scale efficiency as long as the manufacturer makes
available to independent repair providers and owners sufficient alternative
documentation and tools to diagnose, maintain or repair the equipment; or
(6) Cover any repairs provided by independent repair providers or owners under a
warranty;
B. An original equipment manufacturer and an authorized repair provider are not
required by this section to:
(1) Provide an independent repair provider or owner any information, other than
documentation, that is provided by the original equipment manufacturer to an
authorized repair provider;
(2) Make available any documentation, parts or tools for the purposes of modifying
or making modifications to any digital electronic equipment; or
(3) Make available any documentation, parts or tools in a manner that is
inconsistent with or in violation of applicable federal or state law;
Page 5 - 132LR1519(01)

C. In complying with the requirements of this section, an original equipment
manufacturer may make available documentation, parts or tools to an independent
repair provider or owner directly or through an authorized repair provider or an
authorized 3rd-party provider.
An authorized repair provider may make documentation, parts or tools available to an
independent repair provider or owner as long as the authorized repair provider is
contractually permitted by the original equipment manufacturer to provide and is not
otherwise prohibited from providing the documentation, parts or tools.
This paragraph may not be construed to require an authorized repair provider or
authorized 3rd-party provider to provide such documentation, parts or tools to an
independent repair provider or owner or to relieve an original equipment manufacturer
of its obligations to make available documentation, parts or tools to an independent
repair provider or owner; and
D. An original equipment manufacturer is not liable under this section for damages
resulting from improper use of personal data or any data privacy or security breach in
connection with repair, diagnosis, maintenance or modification of digital electronic
equipment by an independent repair provider or owner.
This section may not be construed to abrogate, interfere with, contradict or alter the terms
of any agreement between an original equipment manufacturer and an authorized repair
provider, including, but not limited to, the performance or provision of warranty or recall
repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original equipment
manufacturer pursuant to such an authorized repair agreement, except that any provision in
such an authorized repair agreement that purports to waive, avoid, restrict or limit an
original equipment manufacturer's compliance with this section is void and unenforceable.
4. Written notice required. Before repairing digital electronic equipment subject to
the requirements of this section, an independent repair provider shall provide to a customer
a written notice that contains the following information:
A. That the independent repair provider is not an authorized repair provider for the
digital electronic equipment; and
B. Whether the independent repair provider, in repairing digital electronic equipment,
uses any used replacement parts or replacement parts provided by a supplier other than
the original equipment manufacturer of the digital electronic equipment.
5. Violations. A violation of this section is a violation of the Maine Unfair Trade
Practices Act.